Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.180

Costs of county officers reimbursed.

(1) The board must reimburse the county auditor, assessor, and treasurer for the actual costs of services performed by them in behalf of the district.

(2) A district may reduce costs of services performed by the county treasurer by assisting the treasurer in sending tax notices to taxpayers pursuant to RCW 36.95.160.

[ 2013 c 191 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 18.]